Tennessee, session 114, HB0203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-1-303(b), is amended by deleting
"annual report to the governor and" and substituting "annual report to the governor, the
legislative librarian, and the".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0203
001294
- 1 -